Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.012, is amended to read: 299A.012 new text begin PROHIBITION ON new text end ACCEPTANCE OF PRIVATE FUNDSdeleted text begin ; APPROPRIATIONdeleted text end . deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The commissioner may new text begin not new text end accept donations, nonfederal grants, bequests, deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ornew text end other gifts of money to carry out the purposes of chapter 299Anew text begin or for any other purposenew text end . deleted text begin The commissioner may not accept any contributions under this section unless the contributions can be applied to divisions and programs that are related to statutory duties of the department. Donations, nonfederal grants, bequests, or other gifts of money accepted by the commissioner must be deposited in an account in the special revenue fund and are appropriated to the commissioner for the purpose for which the money was given if the department is authorized to conduct that activity under this chapter.deleted text end deleted text begin (b) By January 15 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on the money received under this section, the sources of the money, and the specific purposes for which it was used. deleted text end